Florida, session 2026, HB37.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
125.0103, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (e),
and a new paragraph (d) is added to that subsection to read:
125.0103 Ordinances and rules imposing price controls.—
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb37-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 37 2026
(1)
(d)1. Counties shall establish a daily administration fee
for the proper storage of electric vehicles, as defined in s.
320.01(36), which have been involved in an accident. The daily
administration fee for proper storage of an electric vehicle may
be up to three times the amount established under paragraph (c)
and shall apply in the event the electric vehicle owner or
operator is incapacitated, is unavailable, leaves the
procurement of wrecker service to the law enforcement officer at
the scene, or otherwise does not consent to the removal of the
electric vehicle. Such fee may not be charged unless the
electric vehicle is properly stored as defined in this
paragraph.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
a. "Daily administration fee" means a fee imposed by a
wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator for
administrative costs for towing and storing a damaged electric
vehicle after the cleanup of the accident scene and debris
removal in order to provide proper storage of the damaged
electric vehicle.
b. "Proper storage" means the damaged electric vehicle is
separated from combustibles and structures by at least 50 feet
on all sides or is surrounded by a barrier of earth, steel,
concrete, or solid masonry.
Section 2. Paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of section
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb37-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 37 2026
166.043, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph (e), and
a new paragraph (d) is added to that subsection to read:
166.043 Ordinances and rules imposing price controls.—
(1)
(d)1. Municipalities may establish a daily administration
fee for the proper storage of electric vehicles, as defined in
s. 320.01(36), which have been involved in an accident. The
daily administration fee for proper storage of an electric
vehicle may be up to three times the amount established under
paragraph (c) and shall apply in the event the electric vehicle
owner or operator is incapacitated, is unavailable, leaves the
procurement of wrecker service to the law enforcement officer at
the scene, or otherwise does not consent to the removal of the
electric vehicle. Such fee may not be charged unless the
electric vehicle is properly stored as defined in this
paragraph. If a municipality enacts an ordinance establishing a
daily administration fee as defined in this paragraph, a
county's ordinance establishing a daily administration fee under
s. 125.0103(1)(d) does not apply within such municipality.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, the term:
a. "Daily administration fee" means a fee imposed by a
wrecker service or towing-storage or wrecker operator for
administrative costs for towing and storing a damaged electric
vehicle after the cleanup of the accident scene and debris
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb37-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 37 2026
removal in order to provide proper storage of the damaged
electric vehicle.
b. "Proper storage" means the damaged electric vehicle is
separated from combustibles and structures by at least 50 feet
on all sides or is surrounded by a barrier of earth, steel,
concrete, or solid masonry.
Section 3. Section 324.0222, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
324.0222 Storage of electric vehicles; coverage.—Nothing
in s. 125.0103 or s. 166.043 relating to the storage of electric
vehicles requires a motor vehicle insurer to pay any costs
beyond costs covered pursuant to a contract with its insured.
Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
713.78, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
713.78 Liens for recovering, towing, or storing vehicles
and vessels.—
(2)(a) A towing-storage operator may charge the owner or
operator of a vehicle or vessel only the following fees for, or
incidental to, the recovery, removal, or storage of the vehicle
or vessel:
1. Any reasonable fee for service, including any daily
administration fee, specifically authorized under s. 125.0103 or
s. 166.043 by ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule of the
county or municipality in which the service is performed.
2. Any reasonable fee for service specifically authorized
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb37-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 37 2026
100 by the Division of Florida Highway Patrol of the Department of
101 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles under s. 321.051(2).
102 3. Any reasonable fee for service as agreed upon in
103 writing between a towing-storage operator and the owner of a
104 vehicle or vessel.
105 4. Any lien release administrative fee as set forth in
106 paragraph (15)(a).
107 5. Any reasonable administrative fee or charge imposed by
108 a county or municipality pursuant to s. 125.01047, s. 166.04465,
109 or s. 323.002 upon the registered owner or other legally
110 authorized person in control of a vehicle or vessel.
111 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb37-00